Lecture7/arabic.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
      %<VERB1%> %<VERB2%> %<ACTIVE%> %<PASSIVE%>
      		+Verb +Form1 +Form2 +Act +Pass
		      +3P +Masc +Fem +Sg

LEXICON Root
	Stems ;

LEXICON Stems
drs:dVrCVs              Patterns ;
ktb:kVtCVb              Patterns ;

LEXICON Patterns
+Verb+Form1:%<VERB1%>   VerbVoice ;
+Verb+Form2:%<VERB2%>   VerbVoice ;

LEXICON VerbVoice
+Act:%<ACTIVE%>         VerbPerson ;
+Pass:%<PASSIVE%>       VerbPerson ;

LEXICON VerbPerson
+3P+Masc+Sg:a           # ;
+3P+Fem+Sg:at           # ;

END
